src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON ORROStem
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
 DeverbalNounsORRO- ;


LEXICON CIRROStemTV
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJTV ;
 DeverbalNounsCIRROTV- ;


LEXICON DOHPPEINCH
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! Der/goah0ti changed to Der/InchL, as 0 is bad in tag
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Use/NG:»šgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! ditto
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj ; !
 DOHPPECnj ;

LEXICON DOHPPECnj
 :j jStemsDOHPPE ;
 :Y5 VStemsDOHPPE ;
 :Y6 VjStemsDOHPPE ;
!removed "+Der/j" in front of ":»j"



LEXICON VStemsDOHPPE
 +Ind+Prs: VSufDOHPPE ;
 +Cond: CondV2 ;
 +Pot+Prs:ž PotC ;
 +Imprt: ImprtSg2 ; !Prs
 NominalFormsVC ;

LEXICON CondV2
 +Prs:š CondBOAHTI ;
 +Prs+Use/NG:l CondBOAHTI ;
 +Prs+Err/Orth:š CondBOAHTI ; ! goarošin
 +Prs+Err/Orth:š CondBOAHTI ; !áiggušin
 +Prs+Err/Orth:šivčče%> CondC ; !gorošivčči
 +Prs+Err/Orth:šivčče%> CondC ; ! goarošivčči
 +Prs+Err/Orth:šivčče%> CondC ; !áiggušivčči


LEXICON VjStemsDOHPPE
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV1 ;

LEXICON jStemsDOHPPEpass
 +Ind: CSufDOHPPE ;

LEXICON jStemsDOHPPE
 +Ind: CSufDOHPPE ;
 ImprtC2 ;
  NominalFormsC2 ;

LEXICON VSufDOHPPE
 PrsV1 ;
 PrsV2 ;
 PrsV4 ;
 PrsV5 ;

LEXICON CSufDOHPPE
 +Prs: PrsC1 ;
 +Prt: PrtC3 ;

LEXICON OT-PASSIVE-BASSO
! The first two entries from DOHPPE
! CIRROStem ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
 +Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-PLX:»mušš MUSH ;
 +Der1+Der/meahttun+A+Err/Orth:»X7#meahttu MEAHTTUN ;
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
! DOHPPEINCH ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! Der/goah0ti changed to Der/InchL, as 0 is bad in tag
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Use/NG:»šgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! ditto
 :%>j jStemsDOHPPE ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>Y5 VSufDOHPPE ;
 +Cond:%>Y5 CondV2 ;
 +Pot+Prs:%>Y5ž PotC ;
 +Imprt:%>Y5 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5me K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5min K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5men K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»Y5n R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»Y5ma R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»Y5mis K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»Y5mij K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»Y5ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mat K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»Y5mak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/PlGen:»Y5mijd R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijdda K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»Y5mijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijgujn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»Y5mij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijddi%> PxVvowch ; !!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijddi%> PxVvowch ;	!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijddás%> PxC ;		!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijnni%> PxVvowch ;	!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;	!not likely

 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV2 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Inf:%>Y5t K ;
 +Actio+Nom:%>Y5n K ;
 +Actio+Gen:%>Y5n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5me K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:%>Y5min K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:%>Y5men K ;
 +Actio+Loc:%>Y5mis K ;
 +Actio+Com:%>Y5mijn K ;
 :Y6 VjStemsDOHPPE ;
! The entry leading to PASSIVE in DOHPPE is omitted here.
! The next entries are the non-passive partS of the DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE entry.
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»st BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»stalla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»stadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/st+V:»stasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»steasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+TV:»h BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»halla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»hadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/st+V:»hasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»heasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:»d BASSO-MUITAL ;

LEXICON OT-PASSIVE
! The first two entries from DOHPPE
! CIRROStem ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
 +Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-PLX:mušš MUSH ;
 +Der1+Der/meahttun+A+Err/Orth:»X7#meahttu MEAHTTUN ;
 :j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
! DOHPPEINCH ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! Der/goah0ti changed to Der/InchL, as 0 is bad in tag
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Use/NG:šgoahºti%> GOAHTICnj ; ! ditto
 :j jStemsDOHPPE ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>Y5 VSufDOHPPE ;
 +Cond:%>Y5 CondV2 ;
 +Pot+Prs:%>Y5ž PotC ;
 +Imprt:%>Y5 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5me K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5min K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5men K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»Y5n R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»Y5ma R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»Y5mis K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»Y5mij K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»Y5ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mat K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»Y5mak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/PlGen:»Y5mijd R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijdda K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»Y5mijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijgujn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»Y5mij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijddi%> PxVvowch ;  !!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijddi%> PxVvowch ;  !!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijddás%> PxC ;	    !!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijnni%> PxVvowch ;  !!not likely
! +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijddi%> PxPlComV1 ; !!not likely
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV2 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Inf:%>Y5t K ;
 +Actio+Nom:%>Y5n K ;
 +Actio+Gen:%>Y5n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5me K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:%>Y5min K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Use/NG:%>Y5men K ;
 +Actio+Loc:%>Y5mis K ;
 +Actio+Com:%>Y5mijn K ;
 :Y6 VjStemsDOHPPE ;
! The entry leading to PASSIVE in DOHPPE is omitted here.
! The next entries are the non-passive partS of the DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE entry.
 +Der1+Der/st+V:st BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:stalla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:stadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/st+V:stasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:steasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+TV:h BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:halla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:hadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/st+V:hasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:heasºti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:d BASSO-MUITAL ;
