src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
ballát+V+IV+Err/Orth-a-á:balla%>j jStemsDOHPPE ;
fuobmát+V+TV+Err/Orth-a-á:fuobma%>j jStemsDOHPPE ;
ludnet+V+TV+Err/Orth:lutne%>j jStemsDOHPPE ;
